Tennessee statutes. Title 9 Public Finances
Part 1

Funding of Local Debt

9-3-101. Serial bonds authorized.

A municipal or public corporation organized under the laws of the state of Tennessee, including, but not limited to, counties, municipalities, metropolitan governments, utility districts, and industrial development boards or corporations, may, by resolution duly adopted by its governing body, authorize the issuance, in lieu of serial bonds, of fully registered bonds, without coupons, payable in installments corresponding to the maturities of such serial bonds. Such resolution shall provide that at the request of the holder of an installment bond such municipality or public corporation shall have prepared, executed and delivered to the holder, in exchange for such installment bond, serial bonds in an aggregate principal amount equal to the principal amount of such installment bond then unpaid, having maturities corresponding to the maturities of the installments of principal of such installment bond then unpaid, and bearing interest at the same rate or rates as provided in such installment bond. Upon any such exchange, such installment bond shall be cancelled. The reasonable expenses in connection with such exchange shall, at the option of the municipal or public corporation, be paid by the holder or the issuer. Until so exchanged, such installment bonds shall in all respects be entitled to the same benefits as the serial bonds to be issued.

Acts 1985, ch. 118, § 9.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 1 of this chapter, relating to general audit provisions, was transferred in 1985 to part 2 of this chapter.

Cross-References. Public entities, information concerning debt obligation issuances, §9-21-134.

9-3-102. Facsimile signatures and seals on public securities.

As used in this chapter, unless the context clearly otherwise requires:

“Facsimile” means a reproduction by engraving, imprinting, stamping, lithographing or other means;

“Municipality” means any county, incorporated city or town, school district, utility district, improvement district, taxing district, housing authority, industrial development board, health and educational facilities board, or other district, authority, commission, board, public body or political subdivision in this state; and

“Public security” means any bond, note, warrant, certificate of indebtedness or other obligation for the payment of money authorized to be issued by a municipality.

Notwithstanding any other law:

Any public security required to be executed by the officers of a municipality may be executed with the facsimile rather than the manual signatures of such officers if so provided in the proceedings authorizing the issuance of such public security; provided, that at least one (1) such signature on each public security shall be manually subscribed or, in the alternative, in the case of any public security being authenticated by a corporate trustee pursuant to the terms of an indenture of trust or other trust instrument, only the signature of the authenticating agent of such trustee need be manually subscribed on such public security, if so provided in such proceedings; and

A facsimile of the official seal of a municipality may be placed on any public security in lieu of the manual impress of such seal, if so provided in the proceedings authorizing the issuance of such public security.

This section is in addition and supplemental to existing law and shall not repeal any other law permitting the use of facsimile signatures or seals on public securities.

Acts 1985, ch. 118, § 10.

Compiler's Notes. Former §9-3-102 was transferred to §9-3-202 in 1982.

9-3-103. Term of loan agreements — Security for loan agreement.

Whenever any county, metropolitan government, incorporated town or city or special district of this state is authorized by law to enter into any loan agreement, indenture or other contract or instrument for the borrowing of money, such loan agreement, indenture or other contract or instrument may be for such term as the parties thereto may agree, but in no event may such term exceed forty (40) years or the term otherwise authorized by law, and may provide for such security as authorized by law for the term of such loan agreement, indenture or other contract or instrument.

Acts 1985, ch. 118, § 11.

Compiler's Notes. Former §9-3-103 was transferred to §9-3-203 in 1985.